California statutes. Business and Professions Code
All geologic plans, specifications, reports, or documents shall be prepared by a professional geologist or licensed certified specialty geologist, or by a subordinate employee under his or her direction. In addition, they shall be signed by the professional geologist or licensed certified specialty geologist and stamped with his or her seal, both of which shall indicate his or her responsibility for them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 10.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7835.1.

All geophysical plans, specifications, reports, or documents shall be prepared by a professional geophysicist, licensed certified specialty geophysicist, professional geologist, licensed certified specialty geologist, or by a subordinate employee under his or her direction. In addition, they shall be signed by the professional geophysicist, licensed certified specialty geophysicist, professional geologist, or licensed certified specialty geologist, and stamped with his or her seal, both of which shall indicate his or her responsibility for them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 11.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7836.

Officers and employees of the United States of America practicing solely as such officers or employees are exempt from registration under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

7837.

A subordinate to a geologist or geophysicist registered under this chapter, insofar as he or she acts solely in that capacity, is exempt from registration under the provisions of this chapter. This exemption, however, does not permit any subordinate to practice geology or geophysics for others in his or her own right or to use the title “professional geologist” or “professional geophysicist.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 657, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

7838.

A civil engineer empowered to practice civil engineering in this state, and a petroleum engineer registered in this state, under provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700) of Division 3 of this code insofar as they practice civil engineering in its various branches or petroleum engineering, respectively, are exempt from registration under the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

7839.

This chapter shall not empower a geologist or geophysicist registered under this chapter to practice or offer to practice civil engineering and any of its various recognized branches.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1396.)
-------------------------------------------

7839.1.

This chapter shall not empower a geologist registered under this chapter to practice or offer to practice geophysics for others in this state except as such geophysical work is related to his practice of geology.

This chapter shall not empower a geophysicist registered under this chapter to practice or offer to practice geology for others in this state except as such geological work is related to his practice of geophysics.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1396.)
-------------------------------------------

7839.2.

(a) A professional geologist or professional geophysicist shall use a written contract when contracting to provide geological or geophysical services to a client pursuant to this chapter. The written contract shall be executed by the professional geologist or professional geophysicist and the client or the client’s representative prior to the professional geologist or professional geophysicist commencing work, unless the client states in writing that work may be commenced before the contract is executed. The written contract shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A description of the services to be provided to the client by the professional geologist or professional geophysicist.

(2) A description of any basis of compensation applicable to the contract, and the method of payment agreed upon by the parties.

(3) The name, address, and license or certificate number of the professional geologist or professional geophysicist, and the name and address of the client.

(4) A description of the procedure that the professional geologist or professional geophysicist and the client will use to accommodate additional services.

(5) A description of the procedure to be used by both parties to terminate the contract.

(6) Disclosure of any existence of a current professional liability insurance policy covering the professional geologist or professional geophysicist in responsible charge of the services.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to any of the following:

(1) Geologic or geophysical services rendered by a professional geologist or professional geophysicist for which the client will not pay compensation.

(2) A geologist or geophysicist who has a current or prior contractual relationship with the client to provide geologic or geophysical services, and who has already been paid the fees that are due under the contract by the client.

(3) If the client executes a waiver in writing after full disclosure of this section that a contract that complies with the requirements of this section is not required.

(4) Geological or geophysical services rendered by a geologist or geophysicist to any of
 the following:

(A) A geologist or geophysicist licensed under this chapter.

(B) An engineer licensed under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 6700).

(C) A land surveyor licensed under Chapter 15 (commencing with Section 8700).

(D) An architect licensed under Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500).

(E) A contractor licensed under Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000).

(F) A public agency.

(c) As used in this section, “written contract” includes a contract in electronic form.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 13.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Registration [7840. - 7856.]

7840.

An application for licensure as a geologist, certification in a specialty in geology, certification as a geologist-in-training, licensure as a geophysicist, or certification in a specialty in geophysics shall be made to the board on a form prescribed by it and shall be accompanied by the application fee fixed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 154, Sec. 1.   (SB 1098)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7841.

An applicant for licensure as a geologist shall have all the following qualifications:

(a) Not have committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(b) Meet either of the following educational requirements fulfilled at a school or university whose curricula meet criteria established by rules of the board:

(1) Graduation from a college or university with a major in geological sciences or any other discipline that, in the opinion of the board, is relevant to geology.

(2) Completion of a combination of at least 30
 semester hours, or the equivalent, in courses that, in the opinion of the board, are relevant to geology. At least 24 semester hours, or the equivalent, shall be in upper division or graduate courses.

(c) Have a documented record of a minimum of five years of professional geological experience of a character satisfactory to the board, demonstrating that the applicant is qualified to assume responsible charge of this work upon licensure as a geologist. This experience shall be gained under the supervision of a geologist or geophysicist licensed in this or any other state, or under the supervision of others who, in the opinion of the board, have the training and experience to have responsible charge of geological work. Professional geological work does not include routine sampling, laboratory work, or geological drafting.

Each year of undergraduate study in the geological sciences shall count as one-half
 year of training up to a maximum of two years, and each year of graduate study or research counts as a year of training.

Teaching in the geological sciences at college level shall be credited year for year toward meeting the requirement in this category, provided that the total teaching experience includes six semester units per semester, or equivalent if on the quarter system, of upper division or graduate courses.

Credit for undergraduate study, graduate study, and teaching, individually, or in any combination thereof, shall in no case exceed a total of three years towards meeting the requirement for at least five years of professional geological work as set forth above.

The ability of the applicant shall have been demonstrated by the applicant having performed the work in a responsible position, as the term “responsible position” is defined in regulations adopted by the board.
 The adequacy of the required supervision and experience shall be determined by the board in accordance with standards set forth in regulations adopted by it.

(d) Successfully pass a written examination that incorporates a national examination for geologists created by a nationally recognized entity approved by the board, and a supplemental California specific examination. The California specific examination shall test the applicant’s knowledge of state laws, rules and regulations, and of seismicity and geology unique to practice within this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 12.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7841.1.

An applicant for licensure as a geophysicist shall have all of the following qualifications. This section shall not apply to applicants for licensure as geologists.

(a) Not have committed any acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of licensure under Section 480.

(b) Meet one of the following educational requirements fulfilled at a school or university whose curricula meet criteria established by rules of the board.

(1) Graduation with a major in a geophysical science or any other discipline that, in the opinion of the board, is relevant to geophysics.

(2) Completion of a combination of at least 30 semester hours, or the equivalent, in courses that, in the opinion of the board, are relevant to geophysics. At least 24 semester hours, or the equivalent, shall be in the third or fourth year, or graduate courses.

(c) Have at least seven years of professional geophysical work that shall include either a minimum of three years of professional geophysical work under the supervision of a professional geophysicist, except that prior to July 1, 1973, professional geophysical work shall qualify under this subdivision if it is under the supervision of a qualified geophysicist, or a minimum of five years’ experience in responsible charge of professional geophysical work. Professional geophysical work does not include the routine maintenance or
 operation of geophysical instruments, or, even if carried out under the responsible supervision of a professional geophysicist, the routine reduction or plotting of geophysical observations.

Each year of undergraduate study in the geophysical sciences referred to in this section shall count as one-half year of training up to a maximum of two years, and each year of graduate study or research counts as a year of training.

Teaching in the geophysical sciences referred to in this section at a college level shall be credited year for year toward meeting the requirement in this category, provided that the total teaching experience includes six semester units per semester, or equivalent if on the quarter system, of the third or
 fourth year or graduate courses.

Credit for undergraduate study, graduate study, and teaching, individually, or in any combination thereof, shall in no case exceed a total of four years towards meeting the requirements for at least seven years of professional geophysical work as set forth above.

The ability of the applicant shall have been demonstrated by his or her having performed the work in a responsible position, as the term “responsible position” is defined in regulations adopted by the board. The adequacy of the required supervision and experience shall be determined by the board in accordance with standards set forth in regulations adopted by it.

(d) Successfully pass a written examination that shall test the applicant’s knowledge of state laws, rules, and
 regulations, and of the principles and practices of geophysics within this state. The board shall administer the test on the state laws and the board’s rules and regulations as a separate part of the examination for licensure as a geophysicist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 629, Sec. 2.   (SB 1085)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7841.2.

(a) An applicant for certification as a geologist-in-training shall comply with all of the following:

(1) Not have committed acts or crimes constituting grounds for denial of certification under Section 480.

(2) Successfully pass the Fundamentals of Geology examination.

(3) Meet either of the following education requirements fulfilled at a school or university whose curricula meet criteria established by the rules of the board:

(A) Graduation from a college or university with a major in geological
 sciences or any other discipline that, in the opinion of the board, is relevant to geology.

(B) Completion of a combination of at least 30 semester hours, or the equivalent, in courses that, in the opinion of the board, are relevant to geology. At least 24 semester hours, or the equivalent, shall be in upper division or graduate courses.

(b) (1) The board shall require an applicant for certification as a geologist-in-training to sign or acknowledge a statement of eligibility at the time of submission of the application attesting to the completion of the education requirements established by this section and the rules of the board.

(2) Except as required by paragraph (1), the board is not required to
 verify an applicant’s eligibility for certification as a geologist-in-training.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 511, Sec. 45.   (SB 1495)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

7842.

(a) An applicant for certification in a specialty in geology shall meet all of the requirements of Section 7841, shall be a geologist licensed under this chapter, and, in addition, his or her seven years of professional geological work shall include one of the following:

(1) A minimum of three years performed under the supervision of a geologist certified in the specialty for which the applicant is seeking certification or under the supervision of a licensed civil engineer if the applicant is seeking certification as an engineering geologist, except that prior to July 1, 1970, professional geological work shall qualify under this subdivision if it is performed under the supervision of a geologist qualified in the specialty
 for which the applicant is seeking certification or under the supervision of a licensed civil engineer if the applicant is seeking certification as an engineering geologist.

(2) A minimum of five years’ experience in responsible charge of professional geological work in the specialty for which the applicant is seeking certification.

(b) In addition to meeting the requirements of subdivision (a), an applicant for certification in a specialty of geology shall successfully pass a written examination in that specialty.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 14.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7842.1.

An applicant for certification in a specialty in geophysics shall meet all of the requirements of Section 7841.1 and in addition, his seven years of professional geophysical work shall include one of the following:

(a) A minimum of three years performed under the supervision of a geophysicist, certified in the specialty for which he is seeking certification.

(b) A minimum of five years’ experience in responsible charge of professional geophysical work in the specialty for which the applicant is seeking certification.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 873.)
-------------------------------------------

7843.

(a) An applicant for certification as a geologist-in-training shall, upon meeting all the requirements prescribed in Section 7841.2, be issued a certificate as a geologist-in-training. A renewal or other fee, other than the application fee, shall not be charged for this certification. The certificate shall become invalid when the holder has qualified as a professional geologist as provided in Section 7841.

(b) A geologist-in-training certificate does not authorize the holder thereof to practice or offer to practice geology, in his or her own right, or to use the title specified in Section 7804.

(c) It is unlawful for
 anyone other than the holder of a valid geologist-in-training certificate issued under this chapter to use the title of “geologist-in-training” or any abbreviation of that title.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 15.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7844.

(a) Examination for licensure shall be held at the times and places within the state as the board shall determine. The scope of examinations and the methods of procedure may be prescribed by rule of the board.

(b) The board may make arrangements with a public or private organization to conduct the examination. The board may contract with a public or private organization for materials or services related to the examination.

(c) The board may authorize an organization specified by the board to receive directly from applicants payment of the examination fees charged by that organization as
 payment for examination materials and services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 634, Sec. 7.   (SB 1479)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7845.

Examinations for registration as a geologist or registered certified specialty geologist shall test the applicant’s knowledge of geology and of any established specialty for which he or she applies and his or her ability to apply that knowledge and to assume responsible charge in the professional practice of geology or a certified specialty geology, or both geology and a certified specialty geology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 865, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

7845.1.

Examinations for registration as a geophysicist or registered certified specialty geophysicist shall test the applicant’s knowledge basic to geophysics and his ability to apply that knowledge and to assume responsible charge in the professional practice of geophysics or a certified specialty geophysics, or both geophysics and a certified specialty geophysics.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1396.)
-------------------------------------------

7846.

An applicant failing in an examination may be examined again upon filing a new application and the payment of the examination fee fixed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 188, Sec. 12.   (SB 826)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

7847.

The board, upon application therefor, on its prescribed form, and upon the payment of the fee fixed by this chapter, which shall be retained by the board, may issue a certificate of registration as a geologist or as a geophysicist to a person holding an equivalent certificate of registration as a geologist or as a geophysicist, issued to him or her by any state or country when the applicant’s qualifications meet the other requirements of this chapter and the rules established by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 154, Sec. 2.   (SB 1098)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7850.

Any applicant for licensure as a professional geologist who meets all the requirements prescribed in Section 7841 and who has otherwise qualified hereunder as a geologist shall have a certificate of registration issued to him or her as a professional geologist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 154, Sec. 3.   (SB 1098)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7850.1.

Any applicant for licensure as a professional geophysicist who meets all the requirements prescribed in Section 7841.1 and who has otherwise qualified hereunder as a geophysicist shall have a certificate of registration issued to him or her as a professional geophysicist.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 154, Sec. 4.   (SB 1098)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7850.5.

An applicant for certification as a certified specialty geologist who meets all the requirements prescribed in Section 7842 and who has otherwise qualified under this chapter in the specialty shall have a certificate issued to him or her as a certified specialty geologist.

A certificate of certified specialty geologist shall be signed by the president and executive officer and issued under the seal of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 154, Sec. 5.   (SB 1098)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7850.6.

An applicant who has passed the examination for a certified specialty geophysicist and has otherwise qualified under this chapter in the specialty shall have a certificate issued to him or her as a certified specialty geophysicist. A certificate of certified specialty geophysicist shall be signed by the president and executive officer and issued under the seal of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 154, Sec. 6.   (SB 1098)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7851.

(a) The board shall issue, upon application and payment of the fee established by Section 7887, a retired license to a geologist or geophysicist who has been licensed by the board for a minimum of five years within California and a minimum of 20 years within the United States or its territories, and who holds a license that is not suspended, revoked, or otherwise disciplined, or subject to pending discipline under this chapter.

(b) The holder of a retired license issued pursuant to this section shall not engage in any activity for which an active geologist’s or geophysicist’s license is required. A geologist or geophysicist holding a retired license may use the
 titles “retired professional geologist” or “professional geologist, retired,” or “retired professional geophysicist” or “professional geophysicist, retired.”

(c) The holder of a retired license shall not be required to renew that registration.

(d) In order for the holder of a retired license, issued pursuant to this section, to restore his or her license to active status he or she shall pass the examination required for initial licensure with the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 319, Sec. 12.   (SB 822)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

7852.

(a) Each geologist licensed under this chapter shall, upon licensure, obtain a seal of the design authorized by the board bearing the licensee’s name, number of his or her certificate, and the legend “professional geologist.”

(b) Each specialty geologist certified under this chapter shall, upon certification, obtain a seal of the design authorized by the board bearing the licensee’s name, number of his or her certificate, and the legend of the appropriate specialty in geology in which he or she is certified under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 19.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7852.1.

(a) Each geophysicist licensed under this chapter shall, upon licensure, obtain a seal of the design authorized by the board bearing the licensee’s name, number of his or her certificate, and the legend “professional geophysicist.”

(b) Each specialty geophysicist certified under this chapter shall, upon certification, obtain a seal of the design authorized by the board bearing the licensee’s name, number of his or her certificate, and the legend of the appropriate specialty in geophysics in which he or she is certified under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 236, Sec. 20.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

7853.

A duplicate certificate of registration to replace one lost, destroyed, or mutilated may be issued subject to the rules and regulations of the board. The duplicate certificate fee fixed by this chapter shall be charged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

7854.

An unsuspended, unrevoked and unexpired certificate and endorsement of registry made under this chapter is presumptive evidence in all courts and places that the person named therein is legally registered.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

7855.

Any applicant who is denied registration or authorization shall, in writing, be so notified and informed of the reason therefor. Within 30 days after receipt of notice, such applicant may make written request to the board for a hearing which, if granted, shall be conducted as specified in Section 7861.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

7856.

(a) Each applicant for licensure or certification who has a valid email address shall report to the board that email address at the time of application.

(b) Each certificate or license holder who has a valid email address shall report that email address to the board at the time of renewal.

(c) Each applicant or certificate or license holder shall notify the board within 30 days of any change to their email address on file with the board.

(d) In the interest of protecting the privacy of applicants and certificate or license holders, the email address provided to the board pursuant to this chapter shall not be considered
 a public record and shall not be disclosed pursuant to Section 27 or pursuant to a request under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), unless required pursuant to a court order by a court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 302, Sec. 6.   (SB 1120)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Disciplinary Proceedings [7860. - 7864.]

7860.

(a) The board may, upon its own initiative or upon the receipt of a complaint, investigate the actions of any professional geologist or geophysicist, and make findings thereon.

(b) By a majority vote, the board may publicly reprove, suspend for a period not to exceed two years, or revoke the certificate of any geologist or geophysicist registered hereunder, on any of the following grounds:

(1) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a geologist or geophysicist.

(2) Misrepresentation, fraud, or deceit by a geologist or geophysicist in his or her
 practice.

(3) Negligence or incompetence by a geologist or geophysicist in his or her practice.

(4) Violation of any contract undertaken in the capacity of a geologist or geophysicist.

(5) Fraud or deceit in obtaining a certificate to practice as a geologist or geophysicist.

(c) By a majority vote, the board may publicly reprove, suspend for a period not to exceed two years, or may revoke the certificate of any geologist or geophysicist registered under this chapter, for unprofessional conduct. Unprofessional conduct includes, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Aiding or abetting any person in a violation of this chapter or any regulation adopted by the board pursuant to this
 chapter.

(2) Violating this chapter or any regulation adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(3) Conduct in the course of practice as a geologist or geophysicist that violates professional standards adopted by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 400, Sec. 13.   (SB 1467)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

7860.1.

The board may, upon its own initiative or upon the receipt of a complaint, investigate the actions of any geologist-in-training and make findings. By a majority vote, the board may revoke the certificate of any geologist-in-training who does any of the following:

(a) Has been convicted of a crime as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 480.

(b) Committed an act that would be grounds for denial of a license pursuant to Section 480 or 496.

(c) Committed an act of fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation in obtaining their geologist-in-training certificate or license as a professional geologist, certified specialty geologist, professional
 geophysicist, or certified specialty geophysicist.

(d) Aids or abets any person in the violation of any provision of this chapter or any regulation adopted by the board pursuant to this chapter.

(e) Violates Section 119 with respect to a geologist-in-training certificate.

(f) Commits any act described in Section 7872.

(g) Violates any provision of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 630, Sec. 9.   (AB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7860.2.

The failure of, or refusal by, a licensee or a certificate holder to respond to a written request from a representative of the board in the investigation of a complaint against that licensee or certificate holder constitutes a cause for disciplinary action under Section 7860 or 7860.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 630, Sec. 10.   (AB 1522)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7861.

The proceedings under this article shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

7862.

The board may reissue a certificate of registration, certification, or authority, to any person whose certificate has been revoked if a majority of the members of the board vote in favor of such reissuance for reasons the board deems sufficient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

7863.

A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere made to a charge substantially related to the qualifications, functions and duties of a geologist or geophysicist is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this article. The board may order the certificate or authorization suspended or revoked, or may decline to issue a certificate or authorization, when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code allowing such person to withdraw his plea of guilty and to enter a plea of not guilty, or setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation, information or indictment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

7864.

(a) A petitioner may petition the board for reinstatement or modification of penalty, including reduction, modification, or termination of probation, after the following minimum periods have elapsed from the effective date of the decision ordering the disciplinary action, or if the order of the board or any portion of it is stayed by a court, from the date the disciplinary action is actually implemented in its entirety:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, at least three years for reinstatement of a certificate that was revoked or surrendered. However, the board may, in its sole discretion, specify in its order of revocation or surrender a lesser period of time that shall be at a minimum of
 one year.

(2) At least two years for early termination of a probation period of three years or more.

(3) At least one year for early termination of a probation period of less than three years.

(4) At least one year for reduction or modification of a condition of probation.

(b) The board shall notify the Attorney General of the filing of the petition. The petitioner and the Attorney General shall be given timely notice by letter of the time and place of the hearing on the petition, and the petitioner and the Attorney General shall be given the opportunity to present both oral and documentary evidence and argument to the board. The petitioner shall at all times have the burden of proof to establish by clear and convincing evidence that he or she is
 entitled to the relief sought in the petition.

(c) The board itself or an administrative law judge, if one is designated by the board, shall hear the petition and shall prepare a written decision setting forth the reasons supporting the decision.

(d) The board may grant or deny the petition or may impose any terms and conditions that it reasonably deems appropriate as a condition of reinstatement or reduction or modification of the penalty.

(e) A petition shall not be considered while the petitioner is under sentence for any criminal offense, including any period during which the petitioner is on court-imposed probation or parole. A petition shall not be considered while there is an accusation or petition to revoke probation pending against the petitioner.

(f) The board may, in its discretion, deny without hearing or argument any petition that is filed pursuant to this section within a period of two years from the effective date of a prior decision following a hearing under this section.

(g) Judicial review of the board’s decision following a hearing under this section may be sought by way of a petition for writ of administrative mandamus pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure. The party seeking to overturn the board’s decision shall have the burden of proof in any mandamus proceeding. In the mandamus proceeding, if it is alleged that there has been an abuse of discretion because the board’s findings are not supported by the evidence, abuse of discretion is established if the court determines that the findings are not supported by substantial evidence in light of the whole record.

(h) The following
 definitions shall apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “Certificate” includes a certificate of registration or license as a professional geologist or professional geophysicist or certification as a geologist-in-training.

(2) “Petitioner” means a professional geologist or professional geophysicist or a geologist-in-training whose certificate has been revoked, suspended, or surrendered or placed on probation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 400, Sec. 14.   (SB 1467)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Offenses Against the Chapter [7870. - 7874.]

7870.

The board shall have the power, duty and authority to investigate violations of the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 942.)
-------------------------------------------

7871.

It shall be the duty of the respective officers charged with the enforcement of laws and ordinances to prosecute all persons charged with the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter.

It shall be the duty of the executive officer of the board, under the direction of the board, to aid these officers in the enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 47, Sec. 76.   Effective March 21, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

7872.

A person who does any of the following is guilty of a misdemeanor:

(a) Unless the person is exempt from licensure under this chapter, practices or offers to practice geology or geophysics for others in this state according to the provisions of this chapter without legal authorization.

(b) Presents or attempts to file as their own the certificate of a geologist-in-training or the license of a professional geologist, certified specialty geologist, a professional geophysicist, or a certified specialty geophysicist, unless they are the person named on the certificate or the license.

(c) Gives false evidence of any kind to the board, or to any board member, in
 obtaining a certificate or a license.

(d) Impersonates or uses the seal, signature, or license number of any professional geologist, certified specialty geologist, professional geophysicist, or certified specialty geophysicist or who uses a false license number.

(e) Impersonates or uses the certificate number of a geologist-in-training or who uses a false certificate.

(f) Uses an expired, suspended, surrendered, or revoked certificate or license.

(g) Represents themselves as, or uses the title of, professional geologist, or any other title whereby the person could be considered as practicing or offering to practice geology for others, unless the person is qualified by licensure as a professional geologist under this chapter, or represents themselves as,
 or uses the title of, professional geophysicist, or any other title whereby the person could be considered as practicing or offering to practice geophysics for others, unless the person is qualified by licensure as a professional geophysicist under this chapter.

(h) Unless the person is licensed, manages, or conducts as manager, proprietor, or agent, any place of business from which geological or geophysical work is solicited, performed, or practiced for others, except as authorized pursuant to Section 7834.

(i) Uses the title, or any combination of that title, of “professional geologist,” “registered geophysicist,” or “professional geophysicist,” the title of any licensed certified specialty geologist or any licensed certified specialty geophysicist, or “geologist-in-training,” or who makes use of any abbreviation of a title that might lead to the belief that the person is
 licensed as a geologist, a geophysicist, a certified specialty geologist, or a certified specialty geophysicist, or holds a certificate as a geologist-in-training, without being licensed, licensed and certified, or certified, as required by this chapter.

(j) Violates any provision of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 588, Sec. 14.   (AB 3253)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

7873.

Whenever any person has engaged in or is about to engage in any act or practice which constitutes or which, in the opinion of the board, will constitute an offense against this chapter, the superior court of the county in which the offense has occurred or is about to occur, on application of the board, may issue an injunction or other appropriate order restraining such act or practice.

The proceedings authorized by this section shall be in accordance with the provisions contained in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525) of Title 7 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

7874.

(a) If a licensee who is retained as an expert witness enters into a nondisclosure agreement, that agreement shall not be construed to prevent the licensee from reporting a potential violation of the Geologist and Geophysicist Act to the board.
